Idaho statutes. Title 46 MILITIA AND MILITARY AFFAIRS
Chapter 3
EQUIPMENT AND ALLOWANCES

Sec.

§ 46-301. Equipment of organizations — Commissioned officers.

All organizations of the national guard shall be equipped with such arms, equipment and such other supplies as may be furnished to the state under the provisions of the national defense act. The commanding officer of any organization or detachment of the national guard of this state to which such property of the United States has been issued for use in military service shall keep said property in proper repair, in good condition, and is hereby charged with the proper custody and safekeeping thereof.

§ 46-302. Equipment for enlisted personnel

Punishment for unlawful use. [Repealed.]

§ 46-303. Personal responsibility for money and property. [Repealed.]

§ 46-304. Disposal of equipment — Unauthorized use of insignia

Penalties. [Repealed.]

§ 46-305. Lost or damaged equipment

Liability of responsible officer. [Repealed.]

§ 46-306. Loss or damage to property

Liability of responsible enlisted person. [Repealed.]

§ 46-307. Uniforms prescribed. [Repealed.]

§ 46-308. Officers responsible for money or property

Bond. [Repealed.]

§ 46-309. Allowance for military expenses. [Repealed.]

§ 46-310. Officers’ annual allowance. [Repealed.]

§ 46-311, 46-312. Artillery and cavalry — Allowance for hire of horses — Military expenses — Annual allowance to companies — Additional allowance by county commissioners. [Repealed.]

§ 46-313. Officers’ annual allowance. [Repealed.]

§ 46-314. Educational encouragement.

The adjutant general of the Idaho national guard is authorized to encourage recruitment and retention of national guardsmen by providing incentive payments as set forth hereinafter. The adjutant general may authorize the payment of not more than one hundred percent (100%) of student registration fees or tuition for each semester for each member of the active Idaho national guard who attends a public or private institution of higher education in Idaho, a career technical education school, or a community college organized under the provisions of chapter 21, title 33, Idaho Code. To be eligible to receive benefits, an individual must be a member in good standing of the active Idaho national guard at the beginning of and throughout the entire semester for which benefits are received.